Utah statutes.
4-2-8.6.   Cooperative agreements and grants to prevent wildland fire.

After consulting with the Department of Natural Resources and the Conservation Commission, the department may:

(1)  enter into a cooperative agreement with a state agency, a federal agency, or a federal, state, tribal, or private landowner to prevent catastrophic wildland fire through land restoration in a watershed that:

(a)  is impacted by cheatgrass or other invasive species; or

(b)  has a fuel load that may contribute to a catastrophic wildland fire;

(2)  expend money from the Invasive Species Mitigation Account created in Section 4-2-8.7; and

(3)  in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, make rules to:

(a)  administer this section; and

(b)  give grants from the Invasive Species Mitigation Account.



Amended by Chapter 278, 2010 General Session

